Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1985 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1985, 1990, 2002, 2012, and 2019 to make other, minor word changes.

Collateral references. —

Powell and Rohan, Powell on Real Property (Matthew Bender).

Real Estate Tax Digest (Matthew Bender).

Lawrence D. Cherkis, Collier Real Estate Transactions and the Bankruptcy Code (Matthew Bender).

Patrick J. Rohan, Real Estate Financing — Text, Forms, Tax Analysis (Matthew Bender).

Karl B. Holtschue, Purchase and Sale of Real Property (Matthew Bender).

Backman and Thomas, A Practical Guide to Disputes Between Adjoining Landowners — Easements (Matthew Bender).

Steven A. Cozen, Insuring Real Property (Matthew Bender).

Thomas V. Glynn, Federal Taxes Affecting Real Estate (Matthew Bender).